Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.281

Cause of action for injury or death, when.

If injury or death results to a member from the intentional or negligent act or omission of a member's governmental employer, the member, the widow, widower, child, or dependent of the member shall have the privilege to benefit under this chapter and also have cause of action against the governmental employer as otherwise provided by law, for any excess of damages over the amount received or receivable under this chapter.

[ 1991 c 35 s 28; 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 15. Formerly RCW 41.26.058, 41.26.280.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Purpose—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 257: See notes following RCW 41.26.030.